Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Chapter 19. Underhill Incorporated School District

§ 19-1.
Incorporation of district.

School Districts Number 2 of Jericho and Number 3 of Underhill are hereby incorporated as a graded school district, by the name of the Underhill Graded School District, and shall have all the powers, duties, and privileges granted by law to graded school
districts.

§ 19-2.
Officers.

The officers of the graded school district shall be the same as are or may be provided by law for other school districts in the State, and shall have the same power and perform the same duties as the same officers in other school districts, except as
hereinafter limited.

§ 19-3.
First election.

The first election of officers of the Graded School District may be held at a special meeting duly warned by the District Clerk of District Number 2 in Jericho or of Number 3 in Underhill by both of the District Clerks, on a petition signed by seven legal
voters in the Graded School District, under the laws governing the warning of special school meetings in other districts, and the officers so elected shall hold their respective offices until their successors are elected at the next
annual school meeting.

§ 19-4.
Annual meeting.

The annual meeting of the Graded School District shall be held each year on the second Tuesday of March.

§ 19-5.
Adoption of rules and bylaws; acceptance of scholars.

The Prudential Committee of the Graded School District, may make such bylaws, rules, and regulations as may be deemed expedient, not inconsistent with the laws of this State, and may establish the grade for the admission of all scholars.

§ 19-6.
Transfer of property.

The Trustees of Bell Institute are hereby authorized, by a vote at a meeting duly warned for that purpose, to transfer by deed or lease the academy building of the institution and all the property appertaining thereto, to the Graded School District, provided
the Graded School District, at a school meeting lawfully warned for that purpose, shall vote to accept the property for school purposes.

§ 19-7.
Effective date.

This act shall take effect from passage.